Maryland, session 2026, SB0606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) On or before September 1, 2026, the Maryland Transportation Authority shall
submit a report to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the House
Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) analyze data from calendar years 2023, 2024, and 2025 and provide:
(i) the number of E–ZPass discount plans issued annually;
(ii) the number and percentage of discount plans with unused
commuter trips;
(iii) the average number of unused commuter trips per plan;
(iv) the aggregate dollar value of unused commuter trips by year;
(v) any available demographic, geographic, and usage trends; and
(vi) any administrative, operational, and statutory factors that
contribute to increased unused commuter trips;
(2) include recommendations for lowering the amount of unused commuter
trips, which may include:
(i) extending the allowable usage window for prepaid trips on
discount plans;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 488
(ii) allowing rollovers or credits for unused trips;
(iii) refund or partial refund mechanisms;
(iv) automatic transfer of unused trips to account balances; and
(v) alternative discount plan structures that reduce forfeiture of
prepaid funds; and
(3) if during 2023, 2024, or 2025 more than 25% of all E–ZPass discount
plans have unused commuter trips, include a corrective action plan to reduce or eliminate
the forfeiture of unused commuter trips and mitigate consumer harm.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –